Utah statutes.
63M-7-508.   Reparations officers.
The reparations officers shall in addition to any assignments made by the
director of the Office of Crime Victim Reparations:
(1)  hear and determine all matters relating to claims for reparations and
reinvestigate or reopen claims without regard to statutes of limitation or
periods of prescription;
(2)  obtain from prosecuting attorneys, law enforcement officers, and other
criminal justice agencies, investigations and data to enable the reparations
officer to determine whether and to what extent a claimant qualifies for
reparations;
(3)  as determined necessary by the reparations officers, hold hearings,
administer oaths or affirmations, examine any person under oath or
affirmation, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and giving of testimony
of witnesses, require the production of any books, papers, documents, or other
evidence which may contribute to the reparations officer's ability to
determine particular reparation awards;
(4)  determine who is a victim or dependent;
(5)  award reparations or other benefits determined to be due under this
chapter and the rules of the board;
(6)  take notice of judicially recognized facts and general, technical, and
scientific facts within their specialized knowledge;
(7)  advise and assist the board in developing policies recognizing the
rights, needs, and interests of crime victims;
(8)  render periodic reports as requested by the board concerning:
(a)  the officers' activities; and
(b)  the manner in which the rights, needs, and interests of crime victims are
being addressed by the state's criminal justice system;
(9)  establish priorities for assisting elderly victims of crime or those
victims facing extraordinary hardships;
(10)  cooperate with the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice to
develop information regarding crime victims' problems and programs; and
(11)  assist the director in publicizing the provisions of the Crime Victim
Reparations Act, including the procedures for obtaining reparation, and in
encouraging law enforcement agencies, health providers, and other related
officials to take reasonable care to ensure that victims are informed about
the provisions of this chapter and the procedure for applying for reparation.
